New York, session 2025-2026, A5120.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 305 of the education law is amended by adding a new 2 subdivision 63 to read as follows: 3 63. The commissioner shall establish a uniform dress code for all 4 public high schools. Such uniform dress code shall include, but not be 5 limited to: 6 (a) the length, color, cut, style, and condition of clothing a pupil 7 is required to wear; 8 (b) any logos and/or designs required to be on the pupils' clothing; 9 (c) if any logos and/or designs not specified under paragraph (b) of 10 this subdivision are permitted to be on the pupils' clothing; 11 (d) when and where the uniform dress code shall be in effect; and 12 (e) disciplinary procedures for pupils who do not comply with such 13 uniform dress code. 14 § 2. Section 3604 of the education law is amended by adding a new 15 subdivision 8-a to read as follows: 16 8-a. No public high school within the state shall be entitled to any 17 portion of such school moneys on such apportionment unless the report of 18 the trustees or board of education for the preceding school year shall 19 show that the public high school implemented and enforced the uniform 20 dress code established under subdivision sixty of section three hundred 21 five of this chapter. 22 § 3. This act shall take effect on the first of July next succeeding 23 the date on which it shall have become a law and shall apply to school 24 years commencing on and after such date. Effective immediately, the 25 addition, amendment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary 26 for the implementation of this act on its effective date are authorized 27 to be made and completed on or before such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08780-01-5